Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 1. Substantive Provisions.
Sec. 10.15.295.
Unclaimed distribution, redemptions, or payments.

A distribution of net margins by a cooperative or a redemption of or payment based upon a security, which remains unclaimed six years after the date authorized for payment, redemption, or retirement may be forfeited by the board.
The amount forfeited may revert to the cooperative, if, at least six months prior to the declared date of forfeiture, notice that the payment is available has been mailed to the last known address of the person shown by the cooperative’s records to be entitled to it or, if the address is unknown, is published as provided by law for the publication of summons.

History.

(§ 34 ch 107 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.15.300.
Sale or other disposition of entire assets in regular course of business.

The sale, lease, exchange or other disposition of all, or substantially all, the property and assets of a cooperative, when made in the usual and regular course of the business of the cooperative, may be made on the terms and conditions and for the consideration authorized by the board.
The consideration may consist in whole or in part of money or real or personal property, including shares of another cooperative, corporation or association, domestic or foreign, as authorized by its board. Authorization or consent of members or shareholders is not required.

History.

(§ 35(1) ch 107 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.15.305.
Sale or other disposition of entire assets not in regular course of business.

A sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all the property and assets, with or without the good will, of a cooperative, if not made in the usual and regular course of its business, may be made upon the terms and for the consideration, which may consist in whole or in part of money or real or personal property, including shares of another cooperative, corporation, or association, as may be authorized in the following manner:

the board shall adopt a resolution recommending the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition and directing the submission of the resolution to a vote at a meeting of members, which may be either an annual or a special meeting, or if there are shareholders the submission shall be to a joint meeting of members and shareholders; the vote may be submitted at an annual or a special meeting;

written notice shall be given to each member and to each shareholder within the time and in the manner provided for the giving of notice of meetings of members, and shall state that the purpose of the meeting is to consider the proposed sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition;

at the meeting, the members, by affirmative vote of a majority of the member votes cast, and the shareholders, by affirmative vote of a majority of the shareholder votes entitled to be voted, may approve the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition, and may fix or may authorize the board to fix the terms and conditions of the transaction and the consideration to be received by the cooperative.

History.

(§ 35(2) ch 107 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.15.310.
Abandonment of sale or other disposition.

After authorization by votes of members and shareholders, the board may abandon the sale, lease, exchange or other disposition of all or substantially all assets subject to the rights of third parties under a contract relating thereto, without further action or approval by members or shareholders.

History.

(§ 35(3) ch 107 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.15.315.
Books and records; inspection.

A cooperative shall keep correct and complete books and records of account, and shall keep minutes of the proceedings of its members, board and executive committee. It shall keep at its principal office records of the names and addresses of all members and shareholders. At any reasonable time, a member or shareholder, or an agent or attorney for the member or shareholder, upon written notice stating the purpose, may examine for any proper purpose books or records pertinent to the purpose specified in the notice and may make extracts from the books or records.

In an action or proceeding to enforce the right of a member or shareholder provided in (a) of this section, if the member or shareholder prevails in the action or proceeding, there shall be allowed to the member or shareholder, as a part of costs, a reasonable amount to be fixed by the court as attorney fees for the prosecution of the action or proceeding.

History.

(§ 36 ch 107 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.15.320.
Biennial report.

Each cooperative shall file with the department before July 2 of the reporting year a biennial report signed by a principal officer or the general manager setting out

its name and the address of its principal place of business in the state;

the name of its registered agent and address of its registered office;

the names and addresses of its principal officers and its general manager, if any;

a statement of the aggregate number of shares that the cooperative may issue, itemized by classes, par value of shares, shares without par value;

a statement of the aggregate number of shares subscribed, but not paid up, itemized by classes, par value of shares, shares without par value;

a statement of the aggregate number of paid-up shares, itemized by classes, par value of shares, shares without par value;

for cooperatives established without capital stock the biennial report shall contain a statement as to the amount of the membership fee and a statement as to the number of memberships which are issued;

a brief statement of the character of the business in which the cooperative is engaged in this state.

A domestic cooperative filing its articles of incorporation and a foreign cooperative receiving a certificate of authority during an even-numbered year must file the biennial report before July 2 of each even-numbered year. A cooperative filing its articles of incorporation or receiving its certificate of authority during an odd-numbered year must file the biennial report before July 2 of each odd-numbered year.

History.

(§ 37(1) ch 107 SLA 1959; am § 44 ch 123 SLA 1980)

Sec. 10.15.325.
Form of biennial report; delinquent reports.

The biennial report shall be made on forms furnished by the department. The information contained in the biennial report shall be given as of June 30 of the reporting year. The biennial report is delinquent if not filed before August 1 of each odd or even year as provided in this section. A corporation that is delinquent is subject to involuntary dissolution under AS

10.15.505

.

History.

(§ 37(2) ch 107 SLA 1959; am § 23 ch 170 SLA 1976; am § 45 ch 123 SLA 1980; am § 15 ch 50 SLA 1989)

Sec. 10.15.330.
Acceptance of biennial reports by department.

If the department finds that the biennial report conforms to the requirements of this chapter, it shall accept it.
If the biennial report does not conform to the requirements of this chapter, the department shall return it to the cooperative for necessary corrections, in which event the penalties prescribed in this chapter for failure to file the statement within the time provided in AS

10.15.325

do not apply, if the statement is corrected to conform to the requirements of this chapter and returned to the department within 60 days after the report has been returned to the cooperative.

History.

(§ 37(3) ch 107 SLA 1959; am § 46 ch 123 SLA 1980)

Sec. 10.15.331.
Filing notice of change of officer or director.

In the event of a change of an officer or director of a corporation during the year following the filing of the biennial report, the corporation shall file notice of change amending that report before July 2 of that year.

The notice shall be filed in the office of the commissioner and must state the name and current address of a director or officer not stated in the corporation’s last filed biennial report, and the name of the person replaced and the office held. The notice shall be signed by an officer of the corporation.

History.

(§ 47 ch 123 SLA 1980)